tests/Hunspell.Tests/dictionaries/condition/condition.good
ofo
ofosuf1
pre1ofo
ofosuf2
pre2ofo
ofosuf3
pre3ofo
ofosuf6
pre6ofo
ofosuf7
pre7ofo
ofosuf10
ofosuf13
pre13ofo
ofosuf14
pre14ofo
ofosuf16
pre16ofo
entertain
entertaining
gninianretne
ér
éram
érach
wries
unwry
